ashaninka/morphology/AshaninkaMorph/asheninka.script
      define N=S=poss [
       "[+poss]" : [{te}|{ni}|{ri}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=DEM [
       "[+DEM]" : [{ka}|{nta}|{ra}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=PL [
       "[+PL]" : [{paye}|{payeni}|{paeni}|{pe}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=DIM [
       "[+DIM]" : [{patsaini}|{ini}|{aniki}|{ni}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=LOC [
       "[+LOC]" : [{ki}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=river [
       "[+river]" : [{pareni}|{nihaa}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=CL [
       "[+CL]" : [{}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=smallpartDIM [
       "[+small.part.DIM]" : [{patsaini}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=ADV [
       "[+ADV]" : [{nta}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=EXCL [
       "[+EXCL]" : [{ve}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=ADVP [
       "[+ADV.P]" : [{ranki}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=AUG [
       "[+AUG]" : [{ni}|{ite}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=monkey [
       "[+monkey]" : [{koshiri}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=deceased [
       "[+deceased]" : [{ni}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=leaf [
       "[+leaf]" : [{shi}|{tsipana}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=NOM [
       "[+NOM]" : [{tsi}|{ntsi}|{rintsi}|{rentsi}|{rontsi}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=EMPH [
       "[+EMPH]" : [{kya}|{ha}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=smallpart [
       "[+small.part]" : [{patsa}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=Q [
       "[+Q]" : [{ka}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=DUB [
       "[+DUB]" : [{taima}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=ADVT [
       "[+ADV.T]" : [{ranki}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=this [
       "[+this]" : [{ka}]
      ];
      
      define N=S=wide [
       "[+wide]" : [{tsantsana}]
      ];
      

define N [
 (N=S=poss) | 
 (N=S=DEM) | 
 (N=S=PL) | 
 (N=S=poss) (N=S=DIM) | 
 (N=S=poss) (N=S=DEM) | 
 (N=S=LOC) | 
 (N=S=poss) (N=S=PL) | 
 (N=S=river) (N=S=LOC) | 
 (N=S=CL) (N=S=poss) (N=S=smallpartDIM) | 
 (N=S=LOC) (N=S=smallpartDIM) | 
 (N=S=CL) (N=S=LOC) | 
 (N=S=DIM) | 
 (N=S=LOC) (N=S=ADV) (N=S=EXCL) | 
 (N=S=ADVP) | 
 (N=S=AUG) | 
 (N=S=LOC) (N=S=PL) | 
 (N=S=monkey) | 
 (N=S=deceased) | 
 (N=S=LOC) (N=S=DEM) | 
 (N=S=leaf) | 
 (N=S=NOM) (N=S=DEM) | 
 (N=S=LOC) (N=S=ADV) | 
 (N=S=ADV) | 
 (N=S=CL) (N=S=DEM) | 
 (N=S=EMPH) | 
 (N=S=DIM) (N=S=smallpart) (N=S=DIM) | 
 (N=S=Q) | 
 (N=S=poss) (N=S=LOC) | 
 (N=S=DUB) | 
 (N=S=deceased) (N=S=EXCL) | 
 (N=S=LOC) (N=S=DIM) | 
 (N=S=DEM) (N=S=EMPH) | 
 (N=S=ADVT) | 
 (N=S=this) | 
 (N=S=CL) (N=S=smallpart) (N=S=DIM) | 
 (N=S=EXCL) | 
 (N=S=CL) | 
 (N=S=leaf) (N=S=smallpart) (N=S=DIM) | 
 (N=S=wide) (N=S=AUG) 
];

      define NSuff [ N ]; #(N=S=1) (N=S=2) (N=S=3)] ;

      ###################################
      #          Lenition Rules         #
      ###################################
      # nopito (in our lexicon) -> no@PRONLENpito -> no@PRONLENvito -> novito 
      define PWLenitionRule1 [ "@PRONLEN"p -> "@PRONLEN"v || _ [{i}|{a}] ]; 
      define KJLenitionRule1 [ "@PRONLEN"k -> "@PRONLEN"y || _ [{o}|{a}] ]; 
      
      # nokitzi (in our lexicon) -> no@PRONLENkitzi -> no@PRONLENitzi -> noitzi 
      define KLenitionRule2 [ "@PRONLEN"k -> "@PRONLEN" || _ [{i}] ]; 
      
      define Lenition [ PWLenitionRule1 .o. KJLenitionRule1 .o. KLenitionRule2 ];

      #########################################
      #          Vowel Deletion Rules         #
      #########################################
      # noirani (in our lexicon) -> no@PRONLENirani -> n@PRONLENirani -> nirani 
#      define VowelLossRule1 [ o"@PRONLEN" -> "@PRONLEN" || n _ [{i}|{o}|{a}] ]; 
#      define VowelLossRule2 [ i"@PRONLEN" -> "@PRONLEN" || p _ [{i}|{o}|{a}] ]; 
      
#      define VowelLoss [ VowelLossRule1 .o. VowelLossRule2 ];
      
      source nroot.prq.foma
      source aroot.prq.foma
      source nroot.es.foma
      source pronoun.prq.foma
        define NRootPRQ [NRootPRQin|ARootPRQin|PronounPRQin|NRootESin];
      define Noun [ (NPref) [NRootPRQ] (NSuff) ] .o. Lenition ; #.o. VowelLoss ;
      
      ##########################
      #                        #
      #         Adverb         #
      #                        #
      ##########################
      source advroot.prq.foma
        define AdvRootPRQ AdvRootPRQin;
      define Adverb [ [AdvRootPRQ] ];

      ##########################
      #                        #
      #          Other         #
      #                        #
      ##########################
      source oroot.prq.foma
        define ORootPRQ ORootPRQin;
      define Other [ [ORootPRQ] ];

      read regex Cleanup2 .o. [ [Other|Adverb|Noun|Verb] ] .o. Cleanup1 .o. Orthography .o. UpperCase;
#      read regex [ [Other|Adverb|Noun|Verb] ] .o. Orthography ;

      save stack asheninka.bin
